src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ÁLLA-ÆLLA !!= @CODE@
                   :a%>Q1  ATTR                ;
                   :a%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj ;
                   :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ; ! cg in nominal paradigm
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t ENDLEX              ; ! Presumably WeG as adverb as well
                   :a%>    MUORRACmp           ;


! LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ !!= @CODE@ Lexicon DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ now gives both demonstratijvva and demonstratijvalasj
! +A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! 							
! LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@  Look like derived loan adjectives. However, they are not derived. Rather, these are "long" forms of short adjektives as those in DEMONSTRATIJVA and thus not true derivations. Same NO words as i DEMONSTRATIJVA, only another way of making the fit into sami, guess it's because of the odd predicative.  Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: destruktijvalattjav, Attr: destruktijvalasj. (The -lasj is unpopular.)
! ! +A:asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!                  +Sg+Nom:lasj%>      ENDLEX            ;
!                         :lasj%>      ATTR              ;
!         +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ladtja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!            +Err/Orth+Ess:ladtja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!                  +Sg+Ill:lattja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!                     +Ess:lattja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!                         :lattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!                         :l%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
!         +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:lattja%>t   ENDLEX            ;
!                +Cmp/SgNom:lasj%>      R                 ;
!                +Cmp/SgGen:lattja%>    R                 ;
!                +Cmp/PlGen:lattja%>j   R                 ;
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:ladtja%>    PxV               ; !
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ladtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
!                   +Sg+Nom:lattja%>    PxV               ; !
!                   +Sg+Ill:lattja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
! 							
! ! Test data:				
! !!€gt-norm: aktijvalasj # Even-syllable test
! !!€ aktijvalasj:                aktijvalasj+A+Sg+Nom
! !!€ aktijvalattjav:             aktijvalasj+A+Sg+Acc
! !!€ aktijvalasj:                aktijvalasj+A+Attr
! !!€ aktijvalabbo:               aktijvalasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
! 							


!LEXICON A_ADJEKTIV ! now in DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ
!+A+OLang/NOB: ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL ;
!
!LEXICON A_TABLETT ! now in DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ
!+A+OLang/NOB: TABLÆHTTA_CMP_INFL ;
!
!
! LEXICON AALASJ
!           +A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:åladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!  +A+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!                     +A+CmpNP/Last:åladtj ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL      ;
!                     +A+CmpNP/Last:åladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL    ;
!                     +A+CmpNP/Last:åladtj ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL      ;
! 
! LEXICON ULASJ_DÁRBULASJ
! +A+CmpNP/Last:uladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last:uladtj ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last:uladtj ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;
! +A+Err/Orth+CmpNP/Last:oladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 
!   DÁRBULASJ ; !Err/Orth
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! 
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ALASJ
!   +A+Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj
!   +A+Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj
!
!   DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ ; ! LOAN
! +A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ARKTALASJ ;
! +A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ÅLLAGASJ ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ELASJ
!   +A+Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:eladtj
!   +A+Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:eladtj
!
!   ÅLLAGASJ ; 
! +A+CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ASIDASJ ; !
! +A+CmpNP/Last: ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ÁLASJ
!   +A+Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:áladtj
!   +A+Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:áladtj
!
!   ÅLLAGASJ ; !
! +A+CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +A+CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON OLASJ - eksisterer ikke slike ord?! 
!  +A+Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:oladtj
!  +A+Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:oladtj
!  Funnet to ord, men to ulike lexicon.
! girkkolasj+Sem/Dummytag:girkkoladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
! oavdolasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:oavdol DÁRBULASJ ; !


!!
!! Inherent comparatives and superlatives lexica
!!

LEXICON OANEP  !!= @CODE@ Inherent comparatives, gives comp and superl. There are two main groups of word here: Adjectives that are lexicalized in their comparative (and superlative) forms, like sisŋep, bárep. And Nouns that can be compared, like nuortap, gáttep, oarjep (some of these are compared from their noun lexicas and thus are found twice). Some entries are likely incorrect compared forms of other adjectives, like ådåp and ruvvap (more research needed).
 +A:%> BU/MUS ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: lagáp # Even-syllable test
!!€ lagáp:             lagáp+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ lagámus:           lagáp+A+Superl+Sg+Nom


LEXICON TJAVGGÁMUS   !!= @CODE@ Inherent superlatives, only gives superl. Some words are lexicalized in their superlative forms, like dájvvámus. Some are likely incorrect superlative forms, like tjábbámus (more research is needed)
                   +A+Superl:muss    BUOREMUS ;
 +A+Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:musá%>t ENDLEX   ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: dájvvámus # Even-syllable test
!!€ dájvvámus:           dájvvámus+A+Superl+Sg+Nom

!!
!! 4-syllable miscellanious stems
!!

LEXICON ÁRMMOGIS !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -is, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. As 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ármmogisáv, Attr: ármmogis. 
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        +A:is%>      ATTR          ; ! twol fixes the ss > s
                 +A+Sg+Nom:is%>      ENDLEX        ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:issa%>    PxV           ; !
                        +A:issa%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! +A:issa%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !this is wrong:ármmogisáp
                         +A:%>        ABBO/AMOS     ; !ármmogabbo
       +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:issa%>Q1t ENDLEX        ;
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:issa%>Q1  R             ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:issa%>Q1j R             ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: bahágis # Even-syllable test
!!€ bahágis:             bahágis+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bahágisáv:           bahágis+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bahágis:             bahágis+A+Attr
!!€ bahágabbo:           bahágis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON SÆHKÁLAK !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -álak, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. So far only for "sæhkálak".
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        +A:ak%>      ATTR          ; !
                 +A+Sg+Nom:ak%>      ENDLEX        ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:agá%>    PxV           ; !
                        +A:agá%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! +A:issa%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !this is wrong:ármmogisáp
                         +A:%>        ABBO/AMOS     ; !sæhkálabbo
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:lagá%>  R             ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:lagá%>j R             ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: sæhkálak # Even-syllable test
!!€ sæhkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ sähkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ sæhkálagáv:           sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ sähkálagáv:           sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ sæhkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Attr
!!€ sähkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Attr
!!€ sæhkálabbo:           sæhkálak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ sähkálabbo:           sæhkálak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON ÅLLAGASJ 
+A+CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
