src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
aktugasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:aktugadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
almmelasj:almmeladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
avtadássásasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:avta#dássásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
avtamielalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:avta#mielaladtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
badjelmærrásasj:badjel#mærrásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
bahágis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahág ÁRMMOGIS ; !
bahámårågis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#måråg ÁRMMOGIS ; !
binnep:binne OANEP ; !lexicalized
boahttevasj:boahttevadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
buohtasasj:buohtasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
bállásasj:bállásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
bárep:báre OANEP ; !lexicalized
bæhttogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bæhttog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
bællásasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bællásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
dajvap:dajva OANEP ; !lexicalized
davep:dave OANEP ; !Noun
dibbmáp:dibbmá OANEP ; !lexicalized
diehttelis:diehttel ÁRMMOGIS ;
divrráp:divrrá OANEP ; !lexicalized
duogep:duoge OANEP ; !xxx
duoppep:duoppe OANEP ;
dábep:dábe OANEP ; !lexicalized
dájvvámus:dájvvá TJAVGGÁMUS ; !lexicalized (OK)
dáppep:dáppe OANEP ;
dássásasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dássásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
dåbep:dåbe OANEP ;
dålep:dåle OANEP ; !from mijá ájgge
dåppep:dåppe OANEP ;
dårrulis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dårrul ÁRMMOGIS ; !
fuolkegis:fuolkeg ÁRMMOGIS ; !
fábmális+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fábmál ÁRMMOGIS ; !
fágajgasskasasj:fágaj#gasskasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
fáhkajguoskevasj:fáhkaj#guoskevadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
garrap:garra OANEP ; ! lexicalized ! from tjaktjalassta
gasskasasj:gasskasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
gieldalasj:gieldaladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
gietjajahkásasj+CmpNP/None:gietja#jahkásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
gijttolis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gijttol ÁRMMOGIS ; !
girkkolasj:girkkoladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
guhkesájggásasj:guhkes#ájggásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
guoljulis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guoljul ÁRMMOGIS ; !
guoskavasj:guoskavadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
gáttep:gátte OANEP ; !Noun
gávtsejahkásasj+CmpNP/None:gávtse#jahkásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
gæddámus:gæddá TJAVGGÁMUS ;
gædnágis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gædnág ÁRMMOGIS ; !
gædnáp:gædná OANEP ;
gæssásasj:gæssásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
håmågis:håmåg ÁRMMOGIS ;
iednegis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iedneg ÁRMMOGIS ; !
ienep:iene OANEP ;
iesjmiedogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iesj#miedog ÁRMMOGIS ; !swedish?
ihkevenájggásasj:ihkeven#ájggásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
jienalis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jienal ÁRMMOGIS ; !
jáhkkevasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkkevadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
jáhkkogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkkog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
lagáp:lagá OANEP ; !lexicalized
lehpagis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lehpag ÁRMMOGIS ; !
lihkkogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lihkkog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
lulep:lule OANEP ; !Noun
luonndodiedalasj:luonndo#diedaladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
láhkajáhkkogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:láhka#jáhkkog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
lávdáp:lávdá OANEP ; !xxx Korhonen/Kintel: lávddáp
maŋep:maŋe OANEP ; !Noun
miehtsep:miehtse OANEP ; !Noun
moattebæjvvásasj:moatte#bæjvvásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
mádjális:mádjál ÁRMMOGIS ;
mårågis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:måråg ÁRMMOGIS ; !
mårålasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:måråladtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
njálgáp:njálgá OANEP ; !lexicalized
nuortap:nuorta OANEP ; !Noun
oajváp:oajvá OANEP ; !from NT
oarjep:oarje OANEP ; !Noun
rahtjalis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rahtjal ÁRMMOGIS ; !
rijddulis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rijddul ÁRMMOGIS ; !
rijkajgasskasasj+Err/Orth:rijkkaj#gasskasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
ruváp:ruvá OANEP ;
rádjánis:rádján ÁRMMOGIS ;
rádálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rádáladtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
sadep:sade OANEP ; !xxx
sahtemus+Err/Der:sahte TJAVGGÁMUS ; !must be sademus (generated by sadep)
sijdagis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sijdag ÁRMMOGIS ; !
sisrijkasasj:sis#rijkasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
sisŋep:sisŋe OANEP ; !lexicalized
skábmogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skábmog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
snjirbbalis+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjnjirbbal ÁRMMOGIS ; !
stuorrusasj:stuorrusadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
sæhkálak:sæhkál SÆHKÁLAK ;
tijmmasasj:tijmmasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
tjarralis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjarral ÁRMMOGIS ; !
tjavgap+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjavga OANEP ; !xxx
tjavgáp+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjavgá OANEP ; ! xxx
tjierrulis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjierrul ÁRMMOGIS ; !
tjábbámus+Err/Der:tjábbá TJAVGGÁMUS ; !must be tjáppámus (generated by tjáppep)
tjáppáp+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáppá OANEP ; !xxx
ulmusjgasskasasj:ulmusj#gasskasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
vijddásasj:vijddásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
vijdep:vijde OANEP ; !lexicalized
várrogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várrog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
vásstálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vásstáladtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
værddogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:værddog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
væráp+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:værá OANEP ; !lexicalized
ájnegis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ájneg ÁRMMOGIS ; !
árjjogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árjjog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
árvulattjap:árvulattja OANEP ; 
árvvogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árvvog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
ássjájguoskavasj:ássje#guoskavadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
ålgop:ålgo OANEP ; !xxx
ållesájggásasj:ålles^ájggásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
åskeldis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:åskeld ÁRMMOGIS ; !
æljogis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:æljog ÁRMMOGIS ; !
